District of Columbia statutes.
23-1112

Enforcement.

It shall be the duty of the Superior Court and of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia to see that this chapter is enforced, and upon the impaneling of each grand jury in the District of Columbia it shall be the duty of the judge impaneling such jury to charge it to investigate the manner in which this chapter is enforced and all violations thereof in connection with the matter under investigation by such jury.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 639, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Cross References

Court Services and Offender Supervision Agency, administration of the Pretrial Services Agency, see § 24-133.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-1112.
1973 Ed., § 23-1112.